Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,193
Not-for-profit organization; sections, how construed.

Except as provided in section 25-21,191, sections 25-21,190 to 25-21,193 shall not be construed to establish, diminish, or abrogate any duty that a director, officer, or trustee of a not-for-profit organization has to any individual or organization.

Laws 1987, LB 67, § 4.